Massachusetts, session 194th, H1575.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
WHEREAS, the many Massachusetts urban neighborhoods recognized as Historic
Districts in Massachusetts were successful middle class communities when they were initially
developer; and
WHEREAS, after World War II residents and homeowners in many of these Historic
District communities were victimized by red-lining by banking institutions and racial steering by
some unscrupulous real estate agents, and real estate values in the community were depressed,
causing housing abandonment and demolition of many historic homes; and
of 6

WHEREAS, in response to this decline residents worked many years to protect these
Historic Districts from destruction and to obtain recognition of the communities value as Historic
Districts; and
WHEREAS, since designation as Historic Districts homeowners and citizens in the
officially recognized Historic Districts in Massachusetts have worked successfully to encourage
families to stay in and move to the community and to invest in restoration of the historic homes
there; and
WHEREAS, as a result of the investments and other efforts of many new and old
residents and homeowners in the Historic Districts the community’s real estate values stabilized
and increased in relation to other communities within cities, and these Districts have come to be
seen as assets the their larger urban communities; but then
WHEREAS, since 2007 the increase of foreclosures in the said Historic Districts in
Massachusetts have increased as a result of the large number of so-called “Sub-prime” mortgage
loans made in the course of the past several years were defaulted on by buyers abused by
unscrupulous banks and lending companies; and
WHEREAS, these foreclosures have resulted in a large number of real estate auctions
within the said District, while at the same time conditions in the lending market have been
disrupted resulting in a reduced number of families being able to access financing for home
purchase; and
WHEREAS, credible studies and reports have documented that the large number of
foreclosures and auctions in the said Historic Districts have resulted in reduced sales prices and
an increase in the number of vacant and vandalized houses, and have undermined the value of all
of 6

houses in the District and made financing for purchase and restoration of the historic homes in
Historic District impossible to access for most families;
WHEREAS, many new foreclosure auctions are planned by banks and their agents and
these market conditions show every indication of continuing for the foreseeable future;
THEREFORE, the time has arrived for the Massachusetts Legislature to provide the
Historic District Communities and the Cities and Towns of Massachusetts with the tools to
protect and build on the many accomplishments of the decades following recognition of these
Districts as official Historic Districts, without damaging the legitimate interests of banks and
other financial institutions which have invested in mortgages and other financial interests related
to real estate within the said Historic District:
SECTION 1. Creation of a Historic District Stabilization Committee shall be authorized
by this legislation, such Committee to be made up of residents of the area, homeowners,
interested real estate brokers, community - based organizations based in the District including the
Historic District Community Development Corporation, if any, construction professionals
working in the area, and local banking professionals with interests in the District.
Formation of such Committee shall take place upon petition of any Chapter 40(f)
community development corporation active within the said historic district to the Secretary of
State of the Commonwealth, or if no such organization exists, petition of any non-profit
corporation active within the said Historic District having among its corporate purpose housing
development or community improvement. Such organization shall be authorized to initiate
formation of a Stabilization Committee as a Chapter 180 non-profit corporation, which shall
have board of not less than seven members including representation including real estate brokers
of 6

with a history or work within the historic district, bankers and mortgage professionals with a
history or work within the historic district, homeowner counseling agencies with a history or
work within the historic district, homeowners residing in the historic district, non-homeowner
residents residing within the historic districts, and contractors with a history or work within the
historic district. Subsequent to the initial organization of the committee permanent professional
representatives shall be elected by members of the groups they represent who have agreed to
work with the Stabilization Committee program. This shall take place within one year after
formation of the Committee.
SECTION 2. The said Historic District Stabilization Committee shall be authorized, by
this legislation, commencing upon the effective date of the passage of this bill, to acquire by
eminent domain any real estate or real estate related property interest including mortgages, tax
obligation, assignments of mortgages, or any other interest relating to any real estate mortgage in
default within the community in consideration of fair market value as determined by certified
Massachusetts Real Estate Appraisers, and shall be authorized to pay for these interests with
proceeds of eventual sales of the said property interests.
SECTION 3. The said Historic District Stabilization Committee shall be required to carry
out a methodical study of the Historic District Community and real estate market in cooperation
with the Planning Department of the City in which the District is situated, the Regional Planning
Commission, and certified Massachusetts Real Estate Appraisers, to measure the economic
capacity of likely home buyers and the Historic District , and to use the data developed by the
said study to establish a Community Appraisal Framework setting forth the probable future value
of real estate within the Historic District Community.
of 6

SECTION 4. The said Historic District Stabilization Committee shall be required to work
with residents on each street within the District and City officials to carry out an inventory of all
properties impacted by default of bank or tax obligations, and a.) shall refer all property occupied
by homeowners or former homeowners to mortgage counseling agencies to determined whether
these families can feasibly service new mortgage financing set at not more than the fair market
value of the based on the Community Appraisal Framework at market interest rates, b.) Assume
management of all occupied properties and determine if the current tenants can afford to remain
in the said properties and whether such continued occupancy is feasible in the context of the
condition of the occupied properties, c.) Assume management of all vacant properties and if
possible repair these properties so that they can be kept occupied by caretakers or tenants, as
determined by the Committee, and not depress or otherwise damage the value or livability of
adjoining and nearby houses, and d.) Restore all vacant and damaged houses to livability and
marketability at all times carrying out all work in accordance with the Secretary of the Interior’s
Standards for Rehabilitation as set by the U.S. Department of the Interior, and e.) Take all other
measures as determined by the Committee to best preserve and enhance value of property within
the Historic District and the health and welfare of Historic District residents.
SECTION 5. The said Historic District Stabilization Committee shall be required to
market all properties and interests acquired in accord with the Community Appraisal Framework
created as mandated herein, and shall establish mechanisms to create and maintain a Housing
Center to work with all real estate professionals and community agencies to carry out this task so
as to best preserve and enhance value of property within the Historic District and the health and
welfare of Historic District residents. Proceeds of all sales shall be used to compensate all sellers
of real estate interests for their property, less appropriate expenses of sales and management.
of 6

SECTION 6. In the event that any community is eligible for designation as an historic
district under the criteria set forth in the National Historic Preservation Act of 1966, but is not
now so designated officially, that community may be entitled to the protections of this Act upon
100 petition of 51% of the property owners of such community and filing of such signatures with the
101 Historical Commission of their respective municipality, or with the City or Town Clerk if no
102 Historical Commission exists. In the event such an election is made, continuation of all
103 protections provided herein shall be conditional on formal creation of a local historic district as
104 defined by Chapter 40C of the Massachusetts General Laws within 180 days of such election.
105 SECTION 7. The provisions of this legislation are intended to protect Historic Districts
106 victimized by the present foreclosure crisis. Therefore all protections provided herein shall be
107 restricted to those Historic Districts included within the Stabilization Target Areas as defined by
108 the U.S. Department of Housing and Urban Development based on number/percent of
109 foreclosures, subprime mortgages and mortgage defaults and delinquencies, as adopted in
110 conjunction with the Neighborhood Stabilization Program in 2008 and thereafter.
111 SECTION 8. The said Historic District Stabilization Committee shall be required to
112 utilize the services of local residents to the maximum degree feasible for all restoration,
113 management, and marketing services.
114 SECTION 9. The said Historic District Stabilization Committee shall be authorized to
115 hire personnel, make contracts, issue debentures as it deems needed to finance its activities, and
116 take any other action as needed to carry out the above purposes.
117 GENERAL PROVISIONS: Due to the fact that this Act addresses emergency situations
118 in communities, its provisions shall take effect upon passage.
of 6